Hawaii statutes.
§431:10A-306 Loss ratio standards.
Medicare supplement policies shall return to policyholders benefits which are
reasonable in relation to the premium charged. The commissioner shall adopt
reasonable rules to establish minimum standards for loss ratios of medicare
supplement policies on the basis of incurred claims experience or incurred
health care expenses where coverage is provided by a health maintenance
organization on a service rather than reimbursement basis, and earned premiums
in accordance with accepted actuarial principles and practices. For the
purposes of rules adopted under this section, group medicare supplement
policies and certificates issued as a result of solicitations of individuals
through the mail or mass media advertising, including both print and broadcast
advertising, shall be regarded as group policies. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am
L 1989, c 195, §28; am L 1990, c 84, §5; am L 1992, c 195, §5; am L 1996, c 28,
§4]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next